Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,113
Applicability of act.

Any acquisition of a hospital before April 16, 1996, and any acquisition in which an application for a certificate of need under the Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act has been granted by the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure before April 16, 1996, is not subject to the Nonprofit Hospital Sale Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1188, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 529.

Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act, see section 71-5801.